vi: Loại băng tiểu không tự chủ: Miếng lót tăng cường; Miếng bảo vệ; Miếng lót chèn; Miếng lót; Miếng lót qua đêm; Miếng bảo vệ quần lót; Miếng lót hình chữ nhật; Miếng lót định hình; Khiên; Miếng lót siêu mỏng; Khác
hr-HR: Vrsta jastučića za inkontinenciju: Pojačani uložak; Štitnik; Umetak; Uložak; Noćni uložak; Zaštita gaćica; Pravokutni uložak; Anatomski uložak; Štit; Ultra tanki uložak; Ostalo
pl: Typ wkładki na nietrzymanie moczu: Wkładka wzmacniająca; Osłona; Wkładka; Wkład; Wkładka nocna; Ochraniacz bielizny; Wkładka prostokątna; Wkładka profilowana; Tarcza; Wkładka ultracienka; Inne
sk-SK: Typ inkontinenčnej vložky: Zosilňovacia vložka; Ochranná vložka; Vkladacia vložka; Vložka; Nočná vložka; Ochrana spodnej bielizne; Obdĺžniková vložka; Tvarovaná vložka; Štít; Ultratenká vložka; Iné
es: Tipo de compresa para incontinencia: Almohadilla reforzadora; Protector; Almohadilla de inserción; Protector diario; Almohadilla nocturna; Protector de ropa interior; Almohadilla rectangular; Almohadilla con forma; Escudo; Almohadilla ultrafina; Otros
da: Inkontinensbindtype: Boosterbind; Beskyttelse; Indlægsbind; Indlæg; Natbind; Trussebeskytter; Rektangulært bind; Formet bind; Skjold; Ultratyndt bind; Andet
sv: Inkontinensskyddstyp: Förstärkningsinlägg; Skydd; Iläggsinlägg; Inlägg; Nattinlägg; Trosskydd; Rektangulärt inlägg; Format inlägg; Skydda; Ultratunt inlägg; Övrigt
nl: Type incontinentiepad: Booster pad; Bescherming; Inlegpad; Inlegger; Nachtpad; Slipinlegger; Rechthoekig pad; Gevormd pad; Schild; Ultradun pad; Andere
sl-SI: Vrsta vložka za inkontinenco: Dodatna blazinica; Zaščita; Vložek; Podloga; Nočna blazinica; Zaščita spodnjega perila; Pravokotna blazinica; Oblikovana blazinica; Ščit; Ultra tanka blazinica; Drugo
nb: Inkontinensbindtype: Boosterpute; Beskytter; Innleggsbind; Innlegg; Nattbind; Trusebeskytter; Rektangulært bind; Formet bind; Skjold; Ultratynt bind; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de absorvente para incontinência: Absorvente reforçador; Protetor; Absorvente de inserção; Forro; Absorvente noturno; Protetor de calcinha; Absorvente retangular; Absorvente anatômico; Escudo; Absorvente ultrafino; Outro
fr: Type de protection pour incontinence: Protège-slip de renfort; Protection; Coussin d'insertion; Protège-slip; Protection de nuit; Protecteur de culotte; Protection rectangulaire; Protection anatomique; Bouclier; Protection ultra-mince; Autre
zh-TW: 失禁護墊類型: 加強墊; 護墊; 插入式墊; 護墊片; 夜用墊; 內褲護墊; 長方形墊; 造型墊; 盾; 超薄墊; 其他
cs: Typ inkontinenční vložky: Zesilovací vložka; Chrániče; Vkládací vložka; Vložka; Noční vložka; Kalhotkový chránič; Obdélníková vložka; Tvarovaná vložka; Štít; Ultra tenká vložka; Jiné
th: ประเภทแผ่นรองกลั้นปัสสาวะไม่อยู่: แผ่นเสริม; แผ่นกันซึม; แผ่นสอด; แผ่นรอง; แผ่นสำหรับกลางคืน; แผ่นรองกางเกงใน; แผ่นสี่เหลี่ยม; แผ่นทรงพิเศษ; โล่; แผ่นบางพิเศษ; อื่นๆ
ja: 失禁パッドタイプ: ブースターパッド; ガード; インサートパッド; ライナー; 夜用パッド; パンティプロテクター; 長方形パッド; 成形パッド; シールド; 超薄型パッド; その他
de: Inkontinenzeinlagenart: Verstärkungseinlage; Schutzeinlage; Einlage; Einlage; Nachteinlage; Slipeinlage; Rechteckige Einlage; Geformte Einlage; Schild; Ultradünne Einlage; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de absorvente para incontinência: Penso reforçador; Protetor; Penso de inserção; Protetor higiénico; Penso noturno; Protetor de cueca; Penso retangular; Penso anatómico; Escudo; Penso ultrafino; Outro
hu: Inkontinenciabetét típusa: Kiegészítő betét; Védőbetét; Behelyezhető betét; Bélés; Éjszakai betét; Bugyi védő; Téglalap alakú betét; Formázott betét; Pajzs; Ultra vékony betét; Egyéb
zh-CN: 尿失禁垫类型: 加厚垫; 护垫; 内置垫; 衬垫; 夜用垫; 内裤护垫; 长方形垫; 造型垫; 盾; 超薄垫; 其他
ru: Тип урологической прокладки: Усиливающая прокладка; Защитная прокладка; Вкладыш; Вкладка; Ночная прокладка; Защита для белья; Прямоугольная прокладка; Анатомическая прокладка; Щит; Ультратонкая прокладка; Другой
ro-RO: Tip de absorbant pentru incontinență: Absorbant suplimentar; Protecție; Absorbant de inserție; Protecție subțire; Absorbant de noapte; Protector pentru lenjerie; Absorbant dreptunghiular; Absorbant anatomic; Scut; Absorbant ultra subțire; Altele
fi: Inkontinenssisuojan tyyppi: Lisäsuoja; Suoja; Sisäsuoja; Vuoraus; Yösuoja; Pikkuhoususuoja; Suorakaiteen muotoinen suoja; Muotoiltu suoja; Kilpi; Erittäin ohut suoja; Muu
en: Incontinence pad type: Booster pad; Guard; Insert pad; Liner; Overnight pad; Panty protector; Rectangular pad; Shaped pad; Shield; Ultra thin pad; Other
it: Tipo di assorbente per incontinenza: Pad di rinforzo; Protezione; Pad inseribile; Proteggislip; Pad notturno; Proteggi mutandine; Pad rettangolare; Pad sagomato; Scudo; Pad ultra sottile; Altro
el: Τύπος επιθέματος ακράτειας: Ενισχυτικό επίθεμα; Προστατευτικό; Ένθετο επίθεμα; Επένδυση; Νυχτερινό επίθεμα; Σερβιετάκι; Ορθογώνιο επίθεμα; Ανατομικό επίθεμα; Ασπίδα; Υπερλεπτό επίθεμα; Άλλο
lt-LT: Nelaikymo įkloto tipas: Papildomas įklotas; Apsauga; Įdėklas; Įdėklas; Naktinis įklotas; Kelnių apsauga; Stačiakampis įklotas; Formuotas įklotas; Skydas; Ultra plonas įklotas; Kita
tr: İnkontinans pedi türü: Takviye ped; Koruyucu; İç ped; Astar; Gece pedi; Külot koruyucu; Dikdörtgen ped; Şekilli ped; Kalkan; Ultra ince ped; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип подложка при инконтиненция: Подсилваща подложка; Предпазител; Вложка; Протектор; Нощна подложка; Протектор за бельо; Правоъгълна подложка; Анатомична подложка; Щит; Ултра тънка подложка; Други
ko: 실금 패드 유형: 부스터 패드; 가드; 삽입 패드; 라이너; 야간용 패드; 팬티 보호대; 직사각형 패드; 성형 패드; 방패; 초박형 패드; 기타